Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1973.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 4343(a) and 5104(g) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 4343. Paternity.(a) Determination.--Where the paternity of a child [born] conceived out of wedlock is disputed, the determination of paternity shall be made by the court in a civil action without a jury. A putative father may not be prohibited from initiating a civil action to establish paternity. The burden of proof shall be by a preponderance of the evidence. Bills for pregnancy, childbirth, postnatal care related to the pregnancy and genetic testing are admissible as evidence without requiring third-party foundation testimony and shall constitute prima facie evidence of amounts incurred for such services or for testing on behalf 1234567891011121314151617181920 of the child. If there is clear and convincing evidence of paternity on the basis of genetic tests or other evidence, the court shall upon motion of a party issue a temporary order of support pending the judicial resolution of a dispute regarding paternity. The Supreme Court shall provide by general rule for entry of a default order establishing paternity upon a showing of service of process on the defendant and a subsequent failure to appear for scheduled genetic testing.* * *§ 5104. Blood tests to determine paternity.* * *(g) Effect on presumption of legitimacy.--The presumption of legitimacy of a child born during wedlock is overcome if the court finds that [the conclusions of all the experts as disclosed by the evidence based upon the tests show that the husband is not the father of the child.]:(1) t he conclusions of all the experts as disclosed by the evidence based upon the tests show that the husband is not the father of the child; or(2) the mother of the child was engaged in sexual relations with a man other than her husband during the time that the child was likely conceived.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1973PN2491 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223